Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB223.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 243 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license may, in wet territory:
(1) Sell and serve cannabis-infused beverages to consumers at bars, restaurants,
fairs, and festivals; and
(2) With a sampling license, serve complimentary samples of cannabis-infused
beverages to consumers on licensed premises and at bars, restaurants, fairs, and
festivals, not to exceed twelve (12) ounces per person, per day.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 243 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department may issue a nonquota cannabis-infused beverage drink license
as a supplemental license as set forth in this section.
(2) (a) A nonquota cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license for a retail drink licensee listed in
paragraph (b) of this subsection, if the licensed premises is located within:
1. A wet territory; or
2. Any precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under
KRS 242.1242.
(b) A nonquota cannabis-infused beverage drink license shall authorize the
licensee to sell cannabis-infused beverages by the drink and may be issued
as a supplemental license to a cannabis-infused beverage manufacturer
permitted by the Department for Public Health or the holder of a:
1. Quota retail drink license;
2. Nonquota type 1 retail drink license;
3. Nonquota type 2 retail drink license;
Page 1 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
4. Nonquota type 3 retail drink license;
5. Nonquota type 4 retail drink license;
6. Special temporary license;
7. Special Sunday retail drink license;
8. Caterer’s license;
9. Entertainment destination center license;
10. Limited restaurant license;
11. Limited golf course license; or
12. Qualified historic site license.
(c) Licensees identified in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall purchase
cannabis-infused beverages only from licensed cannabis-infused beverage
distributors or cannabis-infused beverage manufacturers authorized to self-
distribute.
(3) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage package license may be issued by
the department as a supplemental license to a retailer that holds a permit to
operate a hemp retail establishment issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services, provided the retailer derives at least seventy percent (70%) of its revenue
from hemp products and meets the criteria outlined in subsection (2)(a) of this
section.
Section 3. KRS 243.0307 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A sampling license may be issued to the holder of:
(a) A quota retail drink license;
(b) A quota retail package license;
(c) A nonquota retail malt beverage package license;
(d) An NQ1 license;
(e) An NQ2 license;
(f) An NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license;[ or]
Page 2 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
(g) A distiller's license;
(h) A cannabis-infused beverage retail package license; or
(i) A nonquota cannabis-infused beverage drink license.
(2) A sampling license shall authorize the licensee to allow customers to sample, free
of charge, distilled spirits, wine,[ and] malt beverages, and cannabis-infused
beverages under the following conditions:
(a) Except as provided in Sections 1 and 2 of this Act, sampling shall be
permitted only on licensed premises and by licensees holding a sampling
license, during regular business hours;
(b) A distillery shall provide samples as authorized by KRS 243.0305;
(c) All other licensees shall limit a customer to:
1. One (1) ounce of distilled spirits samples per day;
2. Six (6) ounces of wine samples per day;[ or]
3. Twelve (12) ounces of malt beverage samples per day; or
4. Twelve (12) ounces of cannabis-infused beverage samples per day;[
and]
(d) A brewer, microbrewery, or out-of-state malt beverage supplier may conduct
a sampling of malt beverages as permitted by this section at the licensed
premises of a retailer licensee holding a sampling license; and
(e) A cannabis-infused beverage manufacturer permitted by the Department for
Public Health or the holder of a cannabis-infused beverage distributor's
license may conduct a sampling of cannabis-infused beverages as permitted
by this section at the licensed premises of a retailer licensee holding a
cannabis-infused beverage retail package license or a nonquota cannabis-
infused beverage drink license.
(3) Retailers holding a sampling license shall:
(a) Notify the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control at least seven (7) days
Page 3 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
in advance of conducting a free sampling event; and
(b) Limit a sampling event to a period not to exceed four (4) consecutive hours
between 12 noon and 8 p.m.
(4) In addition to free sampling, a quota retail package licensee holding a sampling
license may also sell sample distilled spirits and wine under the following
conditions:
(a) Paid samples may be sold only on licensed premises and by licensees holding
a sampling license, during regular business hours; and
(b) A licensee shall limit a customer to purchased samples totaling no more than:
1. Two (2) ounces of distilled spirits per day; and
2. Nine (9) ounces of wine per day.
(5) A quota retail package licensee holding both a sampling license and a nonquota
retail malt beverage package license may also sell samples of malt beverages under
the following conditions:
(a) Paid samples may be sold only on licensed premises and by licensees holding
a sampling license, during regular business hours;
(b) A licensee shall limit a customer to no more than sixteen (16) ounces of malt
beverages per day; and
(c) The retail price of a sample shall not be less than a licensee's purchase cost of
the sample.
(6) No customer shall be allowed to receive a combination of free and purchased
samples totaling more than:
(a) Two (2) ounces of distilled spirits per day; and
(b) Nine (9) ounces of wine per day.
(7) Free and paid samples provided under this section shall not constitute drink sales.
Section 4. KRS 243.401 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The distribution and retail sale of cannabis-infused beverages shall be
Page 4 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
regulated solely by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control. The
department shall adopt and exclusively enforce the administrative regulations
of the Department for Public Health relating to the distribution and retail sale
of cannabis-infused beverages until such time as the Department of Alcoholic
Beverage Control promulgates its own administrative regulations on the
subject on or before July 1, 2026, including the establishment of fees to issue
a nonquota cannabis-infused beverage drink license.
(b) The distribution and retail sale of packaged cannabis-infused beverages shall
be regulated by the department. On or before July 1, 2026, the department
shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to establish the rules and procedures for this distribution and retail sale.
(c) A local administrator shall only have authority over the distribution and retail
sale of cannabis-infused beverages in its territory to the extent expressly
authorized by KRS Chapters 241 to 244.
(2) Except as provided in Sections 1 and 2 of this Act, cannabis-infused beverages
shall only be available for retail sale:
(a) By the drink;
(b) By the package;
(c)[(b)] In wet territory; and
(d)[(c)] By the holder of[ both] a:
1. Quota retail package license;[ and ]
2. [A ]Cannabis-infused beverage retail package license; or
3. Nonquota cannabis-infused beverage drink license.
(3) A person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not purchase or consume
cannabis-infused beverages. All restrictions and offenses related to minors and
alcoholic beverages in KRS Chapters 241 to 244 shall also apply in the same
manner to minors and cannabis-infused beverages.
Page 5 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
(4) If approved as a cannabis-infused beverage manufacturer by the Department for
Public Health, that manufacturer may:
(a) Self-distribute cannabis-infused beverages in the same manner as distilled
spirits; and
(b) Ship cannabis-infused beverages under a direct shipper license in the same
manner that a direct shipper license allows the shipment of alcoholic
beverages. A direct shipper licensee may sell or ship to a consumer all types
of alcoholic beverages and cannabis-infused beverages that the licensee is
authorized to sell.
(5) Cannabis-infused beverages may be shipped and delivered in the same manner as
alcoholic beverages.
Section 5. KRS 189.530 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall provide a motor vehicle to another to operate upon a highway,
knowing that the other person is in an intoxicated condition, or under the influence
of any substance which may impair one's driving ability.
(2) A person is guilty of possession of an open alcoholic beverage container in a motor
vehicle, when he or she has in his or her possession an open alcoholic beverage
container in the passenger area of a motor vehicle located on a public highway or
on the right-of-way of a public highway. However, nothing in this section shall
prohibit the possession of an open alcoholic beverage container by an individual
who is strictly a passenger and not the driver, in the passenger area of a motor
vehicle maintained or used primarily for the transportation of persons for
compensation, such as buses, taxis, and limousines, or in a recreational vehicle,
motor home, or motor coach.
(3) A person is guilty of possession of an open cannabis-infused beverage container
in a motor vehicle, when he or she has in his or her possession an open cannabis-
infused beverage container in the passenger area of a motor vehicle located on a
Page 6 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
public highway or on the right-of-way of a public highway. However, nothing in
this section shall prohibit the possession of an open cannabis-infused beverage
container by an individual who is strictly a passenger and not the driver, in the
passenger area of a motor vehicle maintained or used primarily for the
transportation of persons for compensation, such as buses, taxis, and limousines,
or in a recreational vehicle, motor home, or motor coach.
(4) As used in[For purposes of] this section, "alcoholic beverage" means:
(a) Beer, ale, porter, stout, and other similar fermented beverages including sake
or similar products of any name or description containing one-half of one
percent (0.5%) or more of alcohol by volume, brewed or produced from malt,
wholly or in part, or from any substitute therefor;
(b) Wine of not less than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of alcohol by volume; or
(c) Distilled spirits which is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, ethanol, or
spirits of wine in any form including all dilutions and mixtures thereof from
whatever source or by whatever process produced.
(5)[(4)] As used in[For the purposes of] this section, "open alcoholic beverage
container" means any bottle, can, or other receptacle that contains any amount of
alcoholic beverage, and:
(a) Is open or has a broken seal; or
(b) The contents of which are partially removed.
(6)[(5)] As used in this section, "open cannabis-infused beverage container" means
any bottle, can, or other receptacle that contains any amount of cannabis-infused
beverage and:
(a) Is open or has a broken seal; or
(b) The contents of which are partially removed.
(7) As used in[For the purposes of] this section, "passenger area" means the area
designed to seat the driver and the passengers while the motor vehicle is in
Page 7 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while in
their seating positions, including the glove compartment. Passenger area does not
include possession of an open alcoholic beverage container or an open cannabis-
infused beverage container in a locked glove compartment, or behind the last
upright seat or in an area not normally occupied by the driver or a passenger in a
motor vehicle that is not equipped with a trunk.
(8)[(6)] As used in[For the purpose of] this section, "public highway" or "right-of-way
of a public highway" means the entire width between and immediately adjacent to
the boundary lines of every way publicly maintained when any part thereof is open
to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.
(9)[(7)] No person shall, as a result of a single course of conduct, be tried for or
convicted of a violation of this section and a violation of KRS 222.202 or 525.100.
The attorney for the Commonwealth shall elect under which statute to proceed. A
conviction, decision not to prosecute, or dismissal of charges under any of these
statutes shall operate as a bar to prosecution under any other of these statutes for
offenses arising out of the same course of conduct.
Section 6. KRS 243.081 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If authorized under its licensing statute, a license holder with the privilege of selling
alcoholic beverages by the drink at retail shall be permitted to sell alcoholic
beverages by the drink in a sealed container, and by the package in sealed original
containers, on a delivery, to-go, or take-out basis, as follows:
(a) The sale of alcoholic beverages pursuant to this section shall be in conjunction
with the purchase of a prepared meal and only in quantities that a reasonable
person would purchase with a meal;
(b) Deliveries, if applicable, shall be made in a vehicle operated and owned by
the licensee, the licensee's employee, or an independent contractor or agent;
and
Page 8 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
(c) Any person delivering alcoholic beverages shall be at least twenty-one (21)
years of age.
(2) All licensees and their employees and independent contractors are prohibited from:
(a) Selling alcohol in bulk quantities;
(b) Completing sales in dry territories; or
(c) Delivering:
1. Into dry territory;
2. To a minor under twenty-one (21) years of age; or
3. To an intoxicated person.
(3) (a) For purposes of this section, alcoholic drinks to go shall be:
1. Placed in a bag or other container that is secured in a manner that makes
it visibly apparent if the container has been subsequently opened or
tampered with; and
2. Transported in a locked glove compartment or the trunk or other area
that is not a passenger area under KRS 189.530[(5)].
(b) The department may, but is not required to, promulgate an administrative
regulation that sets forth the:
1. Conditions under which sales may take place;
2. Days and times that sales may take place; and
3. The requirements for transportation of alcoholic drinks to go under this
section.
(4) For purposes of this section, vehicles used for deliveries shall be exempt from
displaying the name and license number of the retail licensee selling the alcoholic
beverages being delivered.
(5) Except as provided in this section, sales of alcoholic beverages shall be subject to
all of the statutes and administrative regulations relating to the retail sale of
alcoholic beverages.
Page 9 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
Section 7. KRS 243.117 is amended to read as follows:
If a patron removes a resealed bottle of wine from the premises of a restaurant as
provided for in KRS 243.115, any resealed bottle of wine that is transported in a motor
vehicle shall be placed in a locked glove compartment or the trunk or other area that is
not a passenger area under KRS 189.530[(5)].
Section 8. KRS 243.033 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A caterer's license may be issued as a supplementary license to a caterer that holds a
quota retail package license, a quota retail drink license, an NQ1 license, an NQ2
license, or a limited restaurant license.
(2) The caterer's license may be issued as a primary license to a caterer in any wet
territory or in any moist territory under KRS 242.1244 for the premises that serves
as the caterer's commissary and designated banquet hall. No primary caterer's
license shall authorize alcoholic beverage sales at a premises that operates as a
restaurant. The alcoholic beverage stock of the caterer shall be kept under lock and
key at the licensed premises during the time that the alcoholic beverages are not
being used in conjunction with a catered function.
(3) The caterer's license shall authorize the caterer to:
(a) Purchase and store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS
243.088, 243.250, and 244.260;
(b) Transport, sell, serve, and deliver alcoholic beverages by the drink at locations
away from the licensed premises or at the caterer's designated banquet hall in
conjunction with the catering of food and alcoholic beverages for a customer
and the customer's guests, in:
1. Cities and counties established as moist territory under KRS 242.1244 if
the receipts from the catering of food at any catered event are at least
seventy percent (70%) of the gross receipts from the catering of both
food and alcoholic beverages;
Page 10 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
2. Precincts established as moist territory if the receipts from the catering
of food at any catered event are at least ten percent (10%) of the gross
receipts from the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages. This
subparagraph shall supersede any conflicting provisions of KRS
Chapters 241 to 244;
3. Wet cities and counties in which quota retail drink licenses are not
available if the receipts from the catering of food at any catered event
are at least fifty percent (50%) of the gross receipts from the catering of
both food and alcoholic beverages; or
4. All other wet territory if the receipts from the catering of food at any
catered event are at least thirty-five percent (35%) of the gross receipts
from the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages;
(c) Receive and fill telephone orders for alcoholic beverages in conjunction with
the ordering of food for a catered event; and
(d) Receive payment for alcoholic beverages served at a catered event on a by-
the-drink, cash bar, or by-the-event basis. The caterer may bill the customer
for by-the-function sales of alcoholic beverages in the usual course of the
caterer's business.
(4) A caterer licensee shall not cater alcoholic beverages at locations for which retail
alcoholic beverage licenses or special temporary licenses have been issued. A
caterer licensee may cater a charitable or nonprofit fundraising event for which a
special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license has been issued under KRS
243.036.
(5) A caterer licensee shall not cater alcoholic beverages on Sunday except in territory
in which the Sunday sale of alcoholic beverages is permitted under the provisions
of KRS 244.290 and 244.480.
(6) The location at which alcoholic beverages are sold, served, and delivered by a
Page 11 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
caterer, pursuant to this section, shall not constitute a public place for the purpose of
KRS Chapter 222. If the location is a multi-unit structure, only the unit or units at
which the function being catered is held shall be excluded from the public place
provisions of KRS Chapter 222.
(7) The caterer licensee shall post a copy of the licensee's caterer's license at the
location of the function for which alcoholic beverages are catered.
(8) All restrictions and prohibitions applying to a quota retail drink licensee and an
NQ4 retail malt beverage drink licensee not inconsistent with this section shall
apply to the caterer licensee.
(9) The caterer licensee shall maintain records as set forth in KRS 244.150 and in
administrative regulations promulgated by the board.
(10) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section, a caterer may serve alcoholic
beverages to guests who are twenty-one (21) years of age or older at a private event
in dry territory if:
(a) The alcoholic beverages were lawfully purchased in a wet or moist territory:
1. By an individual; or
2. At the caterer's licensed premises in wet or moist territory; and
(b) The alcoholic beverages are not sold in dry territory to guests at the private
residence or private event regardless of whether the venue is a public place.
(11) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to a caterer licensee in accordance with
subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 9. KRS 243.034 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited restaurant license may be issued to an establishment meeting the
definition criteria established in KRS 241.010(39) as long as the establishment is
within:
(a) Any wet territory; or
Page 12 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
(b) Any moist precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under
KRS 242.1244.
(2) A limited restaurant license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive,
possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the
licensed premises or off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081. The
licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or
distributors, except for purchases made pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.
The license shall not authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages by the
package.
(3) The holder of a limited restaurant license shall maintain at least seventy percent
(70%) of its gross receipts from the sale of food and maintain the minimum
applicable seating requirement required for the type of limited restaurant license.
(4) A limited restaurant as defined by KRS 241.010(39)(a) shall:
(a) Only sell alcoholic beverages incidental to the sale of a meal; and
(b) Not have an open bar and shall not sell alcoholic beverages to any person who
has not purchased or does not purchase a meal.
(5) (a) The holder of a limited restaurant license may purchase alcoholic beverages
by the package from licensees authorized to sell distilled spirits, wine, and
malt beverages at retail, but only if those alcoholic beverages have first gone
through the three (3) tier system.
(b) Any purchase made pursuant to this subsection shall:
1. Only be sold by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or
off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081;
2. Be reported quarterly on a form prescribed by the department; and
3. Include a copy of each receipt of purchase.
(c) The holder of a limited restaurant license shall not purchase at retail more
than:
Page 13 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
1. Nine (9) liters of distilled spirits per month;
2. Nine (9) liters of wine per month; and
3. Three (3) cases of malt beverages per month.
(6) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to an individual or entity that holds a
caterer's license in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 10. KRS 243.039 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited golf course license may be issued to an establishment that is a nine (9) or
an eighteen (18) hole golf course that meets United States Golf Association criteria
as a regulation golf course as long as the establishment is within:
(a) Any wet territory; or
(b) Any moist precinct that has specifically authorized the sale of distilled spirits,
wine, and malt beverages at that establishment under KRS 242.123.
(2) A limited golf course license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive,
possess, and sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages at retail by the drink for
consumption on the licensed premises. The licensee shall purchase distilled spirits,
wine, and malt beverages only from licensed wholesalers or distributors. The
license shall not authorize the licensee to sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt
beverages by the package.
(3) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to the holder of a limited golf course license
in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 11. KRS 243.042 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A qualified historic site license may be issued to any establishment meeting the
criteria established in KRS 241.010 as long as the establishment is within:
(a) Any wet territory; or
(b) Any precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under KRS
Page 14 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
242.1242.
(2) A qualified historic site license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink at one (1) or more permanent or
nonpermanent locations on the premises over which the licensee, by lease or
ownership, has exclusive control without obtaining additional supplemental
bar licenses prescribed by KRS 243.037;
(b) Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink to patrons at public or private functions
held on the premises; and
(c) Purchase and store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS
243.088, 243.250, and 244.260.
(3) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to an individual or entity that holds a
qualified historic site license in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2 of
this Act.
Section 12. KRS 243.082 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A "Nonquota type 1" or "NQ1" retail drink license may be issued to an applicant
operating as, or in:
(a) A convention center or a convention hotel complex;
(b) A horse racetrack;
(c) An automobile racetrack;
(d) A railroad system;
(e) A commercial airlines system or charter flight system; or
(f) A state park.
(2) Any licensee holding an NQ1 retail drink license located in a qualifying convention
center or a convention hotel complex, horse racetrack, an automobile racetrack, or
state park may purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by
the drink for consumption on the licensed premises. The license shall permit all
Page 15 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
alcoholic beverage sales on the premises without additional supplemental licenses.
The licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or
distributors. The holder of an NQ1 retail drink license under this section shall store
alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS 244.260.
(3) A qualifying convention center or a convention hotel complex holding an NQ1
retail drink license may also hold a supplemental hotel in-room service license.
(4) A qualifying railroad system holding an NQ1 retail drink license may purchase,
receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink or by the
package, upon any train that includes a dining car and is operated by the licensee in
the state. Sales shall be made only while the train is in motion. A railroad system
holding an NQ1 retail drink license may sell alcoholic beverages in unbroken
packages smaller than two hundred (200) milliliters of distilled spirits and one
hundred (100) milliliters of wine and may purchase alcoholic beverages from
nonresidents.
(5) A qualifying commercial airlines system or charter flight system holding an NQ1
retail drink license may purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at
retail by the drink, and by miniature bottle, for consumption upon regularly
scheduled or charter flights of the licensee, in and out of Kentucky. The license
shall authorize the licensee to store alcoholic beverages for retail sale at a location
or locations, if operating from more than one (1) airport in Kentucky, as designated
on the license application.
(6) An NQ1 retail drink license may be issued to any qualifying applicant within a state
park meeting the criteria established in KRS 241.010 so long as the state park is
located, in whole or in part, within:
(a) Any wet territory; or
(b) Any precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under KRS
242.022.
Page 16 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
(7) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to an individual or entity that holds an NQ1
retail drink license in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 13. KRS 243.084 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A "Nonquota type 2" or "NQ2" retail drink license may be issued to an applicant
operating as, or in:
(a) A hotel that:
1. Contains at least fifty (50) sleeping units; and
2. Receives from its total food and alcoholic beverage sales at least fifty
percent (50%) of its gross receipts from the sale of food;
(b) A restaurant;
(c) An airport;
(d) A riverboat;
(e) A distiller; or
(f) A business located within, or adjacent to, an entertainment destination center
licensed premises.
(2) A holder of an NQ2 retail drink license may purchase, receive, possess, and sell
alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises
or off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081. The licensee shall purchase
alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or distributors, except for
purchases made by restaurants pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. A distiller
may purchase its own products for retail drink sales under KRS 243.0305. The
holder of an NQ2 retail drink license shall store alcoholic beverages in the manner
prescribed in KRS 244.260.
(3) (a) To qualify for an NQ2 license, a riverboat shall have a regular or alternative
place of mooring in a wet county or city of this state.
(b) If a riverboat moors or makes landfall in a location other than its regular or
Page 17 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
alternate regular place of mooring, all alcoholic beverages shall be kept
locked.
(c) A riverboat licensed under this subsection shall not take on or discharge
passengers when mooring or making landfall in dry option territory.
(4) (a) A holder of an NQ2 retail drink license operating as a restaurant may
purchase alcoholic beverages by the package from licensees authorized to sell
distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages at retail, but only if those alcoholic
beverages have first gone through the three (3) tier system.
(b) Any purchase made pursuant to this subsection shall:
1. Only be sold by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or
off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081;
2. Be reported quarterly on a form prescribed by the department; and
3. Include a copy of each receipt of purchase.
(c) A holder of an NQ2 retail drink license shall not purchase at retail more than:
1. Nine (9) liters of distilled spirits per month;
2. Nine (9) liters of wine per month; and
3. Three (3) cases of malt beverages per month.
(5) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to an individual or entity that holds an NQ2
retail drink license in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 14. KRS 243.086 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A "Nonquota type 3" or "NQ3" retail drink license may be issued to an applicant
operating as, or in:
(a) A private club;
(b) A dining car; or
(c) A bed and breakfast.
(2) The holder of an NQ3 retail drink license may purchase, receive, possess, and sell
Page 18 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises.
The licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or
distributors. The holder of an NQ3 retail drink license shall store alcoholic
beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS 244.260.
(3) A qualifying private club holding an NQ3 retail drink license shall exclude the
general public from the licensed premises.
(4) A qualifying bed and breakfast holding an NQ3 retail drink license shall only sell
alcoholic beverages by the drink to paid overnight guests of the licensee.
(5) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to an individual or entity that holds an NQ3
retail drink license in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 15. KRS 243.088 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A "Nonquota type 4" or "NQ4" retail malt beverage drink license may be issued to
the holder of a quota retail drink license, microbrewery license, small farm winery
license, or any other business wishing to sell malt beverages by the drink for
consumption on the premises only.
(2) An NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Sell malt beverages at retail by the drink from only the licensed premises for
consumption at the licensed premises only; and
(b) Purchase malt beverages only from a distributor, except for purchases made
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The holder of an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license may also hold a nonquota
retail malt beverage package license.
(4) A nonquota retail malt beverage drink license shall not be issued to any premises
from which gasoline and lubricating oil are sold or from which the servicing and
repair of motor vehicles is conducted, unless there is maintained in inventory on the
premises for sale at retail not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) of food,
Page 19 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
groceries, and related products valued at cost. For purposes of this subsection, the
term "food and groceries" has the meaning provided in KRS 243.280. This section
shall not apply to any licensed premises that sells no fuel other than marine fuel.
(5) (a) The holder of an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license may purchase malt
beverages by the package from licensees authorized to sell malt beverages at
retail, but only if those malt beverages have first gone through the three (3)
tier system.
(b) Any purchase made pursuant to this subsection shall:
1. Only be sold by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises;
2. Be reported quarterly on a form prescribed by the department; and
3. Include a copy of each receipt of purchase.
(c) The holder of an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license shall not purchase at
retail more than three (3) cases of malt beverages per month.
(6) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to an individual or entity that holds an NQ4
retail drink license in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 16. KRS 243.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each kind of license listed in
KRS 243.030 shall be incompatible with every other kind listed in that section and
no person or entity holding a license of any of those kinds shall apply for or hold a
license of another kind listed in KRS 243.030.
(2) (a) Each kind of license listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4) shall be
incompatible with every other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4), and
no person holding a license of any of those kinds shall apply for or hold a
license of any other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4).
(b) A brewery holding a license listed in KRS 243.040(5) or (8) shall not apply
for or hold a license listed in KRS 243.040(3) or (4).
Page 20 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
(3) (a) The holder of a quota retail package license may also hold a quota retail drink
license, an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3 retail
drink license, a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license, or a special
nonbeverage alcohol license.
(b) The holder of a transporter's license may also hold a distilled spirits and wine
storage license.
(c) The holder of a distiller's license may also hold a rectifier's license, a special
nonbeverage alcohol license, a winery license, or a small farm winery license.
(d) A commercial airline system or charter flight system retail license, a
commercial airline system or charter flight system transporter's license, and a
retail drink license if held by a commercial airline or charter flight system
may be held by the same licensee.
(e) A Sunday retail drink license, vintage distilled spirits license, and
supplemental license may be held by the holder of a primary license.
(f) The holder of a distiller's, winery, small farm winery, brewer, microbrewery,
distilled spirits and wine supplier's, or malt beverage supplier's license may
also hold a direct shipper license.
(g) The holder of an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an
NQ3 retail drink license, a quota retail drink license, or a limited restaurant
license may also hold a limited nonquota package license.
(h) The holder of a special temporary license, a special Sunday retail drink
license, a caterer's license, an entertainment destination center license, a
limited restaurant license, a limited golf course license, a quota retail drink
license, or a qualified historic site license may also hold a nonquota retail
cannabis-infused beverage drink license as a supplemental license.
(4) (a) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license shall not
apply for or hold the license listed in KRS 243.030(5) or 243.040(3).
Page 21 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
(b) [The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license shall also
hold a quota retail package license.
(c) ]The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license may hold it as
a primary license or as a supplemental license to a distributor's license or a
wholesaler's license.
(5) Any person may hold two (2) or more licenses of the same kind.
(6) A person or entity shall not evade the prohibition against applying for or holding
licenses of two (2) kinds by applying for a second license through or under the
name of a different person or entity. The state administrator shall examine the
ownership, membership, and management of applicants, and shall deny the
application for a license if the applicant is substantially interested in a person or
entity that holds an incompatible license.
Section 17. KRS 243.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A quota retail drink license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive,
possess, and sell distilled spirits and wine at retail by the drink for consumption on
the licensed premises, or off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081. The
licensee shall purchase distilled spirits and wine only from licensed wholesalers,
except for purchases made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) The holder of a quota retail drink license may purchase distilled spirits and
wine by the package from licensees authorized to sell distilled spirits and wine
at retail, but only if those distilled spirits and wine have first gone through the
three (3) tier system.
(b) Any purchase made pursuant to this subsection shall:
1. Only be sold by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or
off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081;
2. Be reported quarterly on a form prescribed by the department; and
3. Include a copy of each receipt of purchase.
Page 22 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
(c) The holder of a quota retail drink license shall not purchase at retail more
than:
1. Nine (9) liters of distilled spirits per month; and
2. Nine (9) liters of wine per month.
(3) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to an individual or entity that holds a quota
retail drink license in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 18. KRS 243.260 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A special temporary license may be issued in wet territory to any regularly
organized fair, exposition, racing association, farmers market, or other party, when
in the opinion of the board a necessity for the license exists. Unless inconsistent
with this section, a special temporary licensee shall have the same privileges and
restrictions of a quota retail drink licensee and an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink
licensee at the designated premises, not to exceed thirty (30) days.
(2) A nonprofit organization holding an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license may be
issued a special temporary license to sell distilled spirits and wine by the drink on
the licensed premises for a specified and limited time, not to exceed ten (10) days.
The temporary license may be issued in conjunction with any public or private
event, including but not limited to weddings, receptions, reunions, or similar
occasions.
(3) The holder of a special temporary license may sell, serve, and deliver alcoholic
beverages by the drink, for consumption only at the designated premises and the
date and times for the qualifying event.
(4) A special temporary license shall not be issued for an event held in dry or moist
territory.
(5) A nonquota retail cannabis-infused beverage drink license may be issued by the
department as a supplemental license to the holder of a special temporary license
Page 23 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 223/GA
in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
Page 24 of 24
SB022310.100 - 1523 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:17 AM GA